Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.49.070

Conversion of national to state bank—Requirements—Procedure.

Except as provided in RCW 30A.49.100, a national bank located in this state which follows the procedure prescribed by the laws of the United States to convert into a state bank shall be granted a state charter by the director if he or she finds that the bank meets the standards as to location of offices, capital structures, and business experience and character of officers and directors for the incorporation of a state bank.

The national bank may apply for such charter by filing with the director a certificate signed by its president and cashier and by a majority of the entire board of directors, setting forth the corporate action taken in compliance with the provisions of the laws of the United States governing the conversion of a national to a state bank, and the articles of incorporation, approved by the stockholders, for the government of the bank as a state bank.

[ 2014 c 37 s 254; 1994 c 92 s 145; 1955 c 33 s 30.49.070. Prior: 1953 c 234 s 7. Formerly RCW 30.49.070.]